Illinois, session 104th, SB3491.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Judicial Privacy Act is amended by changing 5Sections 1-5, 1-10, 2-1, 2-5, 2-10, 3-1, 3-5, and 4-1 as 6follows: 7    (705 ILCS 90/1-5)8    Sec. 1-5. Purpose. The purpose of this Act is to improve 9the safety and security of federal Illinois judicial officers 10and State judicial officers to ensure they are able to 11administer justice fairly without fear of personal reprisal 12from individuals affected by the decisions they make in the 13course of carrying out their public function. 14    This Act is not intended to restrain a federal judicial 15officer or State judicial officer from independently making 16public his or her own personal information. Additionally, no 17government agency, person, business, or association has any 18obligation under this Act to protect the privacy of a federal 19judicial officer's or State judicial officer's personal 20information until the federal judicial officer or State 21judicial officer makes a written request that his or her 22personal information not be publicly posted. 23    Nothing in this Act shall be construed to impair free   SB3491- 2 -LRB104 19469 JRC 32917 b1access to decisions and opinions expressed by federal judicial 2officers or State judicial officers in the course of carrying 3out their public functions. 4(Source: P.A. 97-847, eff. 9-22-12.) 5    (705 ILCS 90/1-10)6    Sec. 1-10. Definitions. As used in this Act:7    "Government agency" includes all agencies, authorities, 8boards, commissions, departments, institutions, offices, and 9any other bodies politic and corporate of the State created by 10the constitution or statute, whether in the executive, 11judicial, or legislative branch; all units and corporate 12outgrowths created by executive order of the Governor or any 13constitutional officer, by the Supreme Court, or by resolution 14of the General Assembly; or agencies, authorities, boards, 15commissions, departments, institutions, offices, and any other 16bodies politic and corporate of a unit of local government, or 17school district. 18    "Home address" includes a federal judicial officer's or 19State judicial officer's permanent residence and any secondary 20residences affirmatively identified by the federal judicial 21officer or State judicial officer, but does not include a 22federal judicial officer's or State judicial officer's work 23address. 24    "Immediate family" includes a federal judicial officer or 25state judicial officer's   SB3491- 3 -LRB104 19469 JRC 32917 b1        (1) spouse,2        (2) child under the age of 18,3        (3) parent, or4        (4) any blood relative of the federal judicial officer 5    or State judicial officer or the judicial officer's spouse 6    who lives in the same residence.7    A federal judicial officer or State judicial officer may 8indicate the personal information of immediate family members 9to be excluded to the extent that it could reasonably be 10expected to reveal the personal information of the federal 11judicial officer or State judicial officer.12    "Federal judicial officer" includes actively employed, 13former or deceased:14        (1) Justices of the United States Supreme Court15        (2) Judges of the United States Court of Appeals;16        (3) Judges and magistrate judges of the United States 17    District Court; and18        (4) Judges of the United States Bankruptcy Court.19        (5) Clerks of the federal Courts. 20    "Judicial officer" includes actively employed and former 21or deceased: 22        (1) Justices of the United States Supreme Court and 23    the Illinois Supreme Court;24        (2) Judges of the United States Court of Appeals;25        (3) Judges and magistrate judges of the United States 26    District Court;  SB3491- 4 -LRB104 19469 JRC 32917 b1        (4) Judges of the United States Bankruptcy Court;2        (5) Judges of the Illinois Appellate Court; 3        (6) Judges and associate judges of the Illinois 4    Circuit Courts; and 5        (7) Administrative law judges as defined in Section 6    1-15 of the Illinois Administrative Procedure Act. 7    "Personal information" means a home address, home 8telephone number, mobile telephone number, pager number, 9personal email address, social security number, federal tax 10identification number, financial checking and savings account 11numbers, credit card numbers, date of birth, marital status, 12race and ethnicity, biometric information and identity of 13children under the age of 18. 14    "Publicly available content" means any written, printed, 15or electronic document or record that provides information or 16that serves as a document or record maintained, controlled, or 17in the possession of a government agency as of the date of the 18written request that may be obtained by any person or entity, 19from the Internet, from the government agency upon request 20either free of charge or for a fee, or in response to a request 21under the Freedom of Information Act.22    "Publicly post" or "publicly display" means to communicate 23to another or otherwise make available to the general public.24    "State judicial officer" means a judicial officer actively 25employed, appointed or elected, former or deceased:26        (1) Justices of the Supreme Court of Illinois;  SB3491- 5 -LRB104 19469 JRC 32917 b1        (2) Judges of the Illinois Appellate Court;2        (3) Circuit and associate judges of the Illinois 3    Circuit Courts;4        (4) Administrative law judges as defined in Section 5    1-15 of the Illinois Administrative Procedure Act; and6        (5) Clerks of the Illinois Supreme, Appellate or 7    Circuit Courts. 8    "Written request" means written notice signed by a federal 9judicial officer, State judicial officer, or a representative 10of the federal judicial officer's or State judicial officer's 11employer requesting a government agency, person, business, or 12association to refrain from posting or displaying publicly 13available content that includes the federal judicial officer's 14or State judicial officer's personal information. A written 15request delivered to the government agency by unsecured 16electronic mail is not permitted. Written requests must be 17mailed via United States Postal Service or hand delivered to 18the government agency and contain relevant details to validate 19the source of the request, which may be accomplished by 20official letterhead, specific identifiers, digital signatures 21or other industry-standard authentication protocols. The 22written request must specifically identify the federal 23judicial officer or State judicial officer's information, 24cases, documents, or other content requested to be removed 25from public display. A written request must be provided for 26any new personal information which may be received after the   SB3491- 6 -LRB104 19469 JRC 32917 b1date of any previous written request. Nothing in this Act 2requires a recipient of a written request to continue to 3review records for new personal information for a federal 4judicial officer, State judicial officer, or immediate family 5that may be received after the date of the written request 6specifying the personal information to be removed from public 7display.8(Source: P.A. 104-278, eff. 1-1-26.) 9    (705 ILCS 90/2-1)10    Sec. 2-1. Publicly posting or displaying a federal 11judicial officer's or State judicial officer's personal 12information by government agencies.13    (a) Government agencies shall not publicly post or display 14publicly available content that includes a federal judicial 15officer's or State judicial officer's personal information, 16provided that the government agency has received a written 17request in accordance with Sections 1-10 and Section 2-10 of 18this Act that it refrain from disclosing the federal judicial 19officer's or State judicial officer's personal information. 20After a government agency has received a written request, that 21agency shall remove the judicial officer's personal 22information from publicly available content within 5 business 23days. After the government agency has removed the judicial 24officer's personal information from publicly available 25content, the agency shall not publicly post or display the   SB3491- 7 -LRB104 19469 JRC 32917 b1information and the judicial officer's personal information 2shall be exempt from the Freedom of Information Act unless the 3government agency has received consent from the federal 4judicial officer or State judicial officer to make the 5personal information available to the public. 6    (b) Redress. If a government agency willfully fails to 7comply with a written request to refrain from disclosing 8personal information, the federal judicial officer or State 9judicial officer may bring an action seeking injunctive or 10declaratory relief in any court of competent jurisdiction. 11(Source: P.A. 97-847, eff. 9-22-12.) 12    (705 ILCS 90/2-5)13    Sec. 2-5. Publicly posting a federal judicial officer's or 14State judicial officer's personal information on the Internet 15by government agency, persons, businesses, and associations.16    (a) Prohibited Conduct. 17        (1) All persons, businesses, and associations shall 18    refrain from publicly posting or displaying on the 19    Internet publicly available content that includes a 20    federal judicial officer's or State judicial officer's 21    personal information, provided that the federal judicial 22    officer or State judicial officer has made a written 23    request to the government agency, person, business, or 24    association that it refrain from disclosing the personal 25    information.   SB3491- 8 -LRB104 19469 JRC 32917 b1        (2) No person, business, or association shall solicit, 2    sell, or trade on the Internet a federal judicial 3    officer's or State judicial officer's personal information 4    with the willful intent to pose an imminent and serious 5    threat to the health and safety of the federal judicial 6    officer or State judicial officer or the judicial 7    officer's immediate family. 8        (3) This subsection includes, but is not limited to, 9    Internet phone directories, Internet search engines, 10    Internet data aggregators, and Internet service providers 11    that are under the direct or contractual control of the 12    government agency, person, business, or association.13    (b) Required Conduct. 14        (1) After a person, business, or association has 15    received a written request from a federal judicial officer 16    or State judicial officer to protect the privacy of the 17    federal judicial officer or state judicial officer's 18    personal information, that government agency, person, 19    business, or association shall have 5 business days 72 20    hours to remove the personal information from the 21    Internet. 22        (2) After a government agency, person, business, or 23    association has received a written request from a federal 24    judicial officer or State judicial officer, that 25    government agency, person, business, or association shall 26    ensure that the judicial officer's personal information is   SB3491- 9 -LRB104 19469 JRC 32917 b1    not made available on any website or subsidiary website 2    controlled or contracted by that person, business, or 3    association. 4        (3) After receiving a federal judicial officer's or 5    State judicial officer's written request, unless otherwise 6    required by rule, order, or law, no government agency, 7    person, business, or association shall transfer the 8    federal judicial officer's or State judicial officer's 9    written request or personal information to any other 10    government agency, person, business, or association 11    through any medium. 12        (4) Any written requests received by a government 13    agency, person, business, or association is confidential 14    and maintained as required by law, order, or rule.15        (5) If a written request or notice from the 16    Administrative Office of the Illinois Courts, directly 17    from a federal judicial officer, State judicial officer, 18    or requester's employer is received by a Supreme, 19    Appellate, or Circuit Court Clerk of Illinois identifying 20    specific court cases or documents containing a federal 21    judicial officer or State judicial officer's personal 22    information, the court clerk must seal the cases or 23    documents identified in the written request or notice. 24    (c) Redress. 25        A federal judicial officer or State judicial officer 26    whose personal information is made public as a result of a   SB3491- 10 -LRB104 19469 JRC 32917 b1    willful violation of this Act may bring an action seeking 2    injunctive or declaratory relief in any court of competent 3    jurisdiction. If the court grants injunctive or 4    declaratory relief, the person, business, or association 5    responsible for the violation shall be required to pay the 6    federal judicial officer's or State judicial officer's 7    costs and reasonable attorney's fees. 8(Source: P.A. 97-847, eff. 9-22-12.) 9    (705 ILCS 90/2-10)10    Sec. 2-10. Procedure for completing a written request.11    (a) Requirement that a federal judicial officer or State 12judicial officer make a written request. No government agency, 13person, business, or association shall be found to have 14violated any provision of this Act if the federal judicial 15officer or State judicial officer fails to submit a written 16request calling for the protection of the officer's personal 17information. Upon the death of a federal judicial officer or 18State judicial officer, an immediate family may submit a 19written request as specified in Sections 1-10 and 2-10(c) 20requesting an extension of the removal of personal information 21from publicly available content. 22    (b) Written request procedure. A written request shall be 23valid if: 24        (1) The federal judicial officer may send sends a 25    written request as specified in Sections 1-10 and 2-10(c)   SB3491- 11 -LRB104 19469 JRC 32917 b1    directly to a government agency, person, business, or 2    association. A representative from the federal judicial 3    officer's employer may submit a written request on the 4    individual officer's behalf, provided that the federal 5    judicial officer gives written consent to the 6    representative and provided that the representative agrees 7    to furnish a copy of that consent when a written request is 8    made. ; or9        (2) The If the Administrative Office of the Illinois 10    Courts shall develop and provide has a policy and 11    procedure for State a state judicial officers officer to 12    file a the written request with the Administrative Office 13    to notify State or local government agencies. Any 14    information sent to or received from a government agency 15    under this subsection may not be transacted via unsecured 16    email. The policy shall be distributed annually to all 17    State judicial officers and provide, at a minimum, the 18    following: , the state judicial officer may send the 19    written request to the Administrative Office of the 20    Illinois Courts. In each quarter of a calendar year, the 21    Administrative Office of the Illinois Courts shall provide 22    a list of all state judicial officers who have submitted a 23    written request to it, to the appropriate officer with 24    ultimate supervisory authority for a government agency. 25    The officer shall promptly provide a copy of the list to 26    any and all government agencies under his or her   SB3491- 12 -LRB104 19469 JRC 32917 b1    supervision. Receipt of the written request list compiled 2    by the Administrative Office of the Illinois Courts by a 3    government agency shall constitute a written request to 4    that Agency for the purposes of this Act.5            (A) the form for the state judicial officer to use 6    for a written request which meets the minimum requirements 7    in Sections 1-10(i) and 2-10(c);8            (B) identification of how to submit the written 9    request, which may include a secure electronic submission;10            (C) a procedure to provide quarterly updates in 11    January, April, July and October to state or local 12    government agencies of any new written requests received 13    and detailed information about the statutory requirements 14    to comply. Receipt of the written request list compiled by 15    the Administrative Office of the Illinois Courts by a 16    government agency shall constitute a written request to 17    that Agency for the purposes of this Act;18            (D) a procedure to allow a government agency which 19    receives a quarterly update to provide confirmation that 20    the personal information of the State judicial officer 21    and, when applicable, immediate family has been removed 22    from public display;23            (E) a procedure to notify a government agency of a 24    State judicial officer's death, request for extension by 25    immediate family, or written permission to release the 26    personal information; and  SB3491- 13 -LRB104 19469 JRC 32917 b1            (F) a procedure to communicate to a state judicial 2    officer that a government agency listed in a notice does 3    not have contact information publicly available and to 4    request the State judicial officer provide additional 5    contact information.6            the information identified by the State judicial 7    officer to be removed from public view in any written 8    request received by the Administrative Office of the 9    Illinois Courts must be included in the notice provided to 10    the recipient State or local government agency. 11    (c) A representative from the judicial officer's employer 12may submit a written request on the judicial officer's behalf, 13provided that the judicial officer gives written consent to 14the representative and provided that the representative agrees 15to furnish a copy of that consent when a written request is 16made. The representative shall submit the written request as 17provided in subsection (b) of this Section. 18    (c) (d) Information to be included in the written request. 19A federal judicial officer's or State judicial officer's 20written request shall specify: what personal information shall 21be maintained private.22        (1) the date of the written request and identification 23    of the person submitting the request if other than the 24    federal judicial officer or state judicial officer;25        (2) the name, home address, date of birth, and contact 26    information;  SB3491- 14 -LRB104 19469 JRC 32917 b1        (3) names, home address, including any secondary or 2    alternative home addresses, contact information and any 3    other relevant personal identifying information for any 4    immediate family included in the request;5        (4) identification of each State or local government 6    agency to be notified;7        (5) identification of the personal information to be 8    removed from public display; and9        (6) the specific areas, documents, cases, or other 10    content in which the personal information for the federal 11    judicial officer, State judicial officer, or immediate 12    family is requested to be removed from public display and 13    whether the personal information is online, printed in 14    paper, or other format.15    If a judicial officer wishes to identify a secondary 16residence as a home address as that term is defined in this 17Act, the designation shall be made in the written request. 18    A judicial officer shall disclose the identity of the 19officer's immediate family and indicate that the personal 20information of these family members shall also be excluded to 21the extent that it could reasonably be expected to reveal the 22personal information of the judicial officer. 23    (e) Duration of the written request. 24        (1) A judicial officer's written request is valid 25until the federal judicial officer or State judicial officer 26provides the government agency, person, business, or   SB3491- 15 -LRB104 19469 JRC 32917 b1association with written permission to release the private 2information. 3        (2) A judicial officer's written request expires upon 4on death of the federal judicial officer or State judicial 5officer unless a request to extend the duration is submitted 6by the immediate family.7(Source: P.A. 97-847, eff. 9-22-12.) 8    (705 ILCS 90/3-1)9    Sec. 3-1. Unlawful publication of personal information. It 10is unlawful for any person to knowingly publicly post on the 11Internet the personal information of a federal judicial 12officer, State judicial officer, or of the judicial officer's 13immediate family if the person knows or reasonably should know 14that publicly posting the personal information poses an 15imminent and serious threat to the health and safety of the 16federal judicial officer, State judicial officer, or the 17judicial officer's immediate family, and the violation is a 18proximate cause of bodily injury or death of the federal 19judicial officer, State judicial officer, or a member of the 20judicial officer's immediate family. A person who violates 21this Section is guilty of a Class 3 felony. 22(Source: P.A. 97-847, eff. 9-22-12.) 23    (705 ILCS 90/4-1)24    Sec. 4-1. Construction. This Act and any rules adopted to   SB3491- 16 -LRB104 19469 JRC 32917 b1implement this Act shall be construed broadly to favor the 2protection of the personal information of federal judicial 3officers or State judicial officers. 4(Source: P.A. 97-847, eff. 9-22-12.)